Massachusetts, session 194th, H3565.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Amend Chapter 25 by adding a new subsection (g) 
Said section 21 of said chapter 25, as amended by chapter 179 of the Acts of 2022, is 
hereby further amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:- 
SECTION 1. Section 21 of chapter 25 …, as amended by chapter 179 of the Acts of 
2022, is hereby amended by adding the following subsections: 
(h) The administrators of the programs established pursuant to section 19 of this chapter 
shall (i) offer to a customer at no cost a zero-carbon assessment of such customer’s building, 
including a heat load calculation, that identifies measures that a customer must take to heat or 
cool such building without the use of combustible fuels and (ii) identify rebates and incentives 
available under such programs to assist a customer in implementing measures identified by such 
assessment. Measures identified in a zero-carbon assessment may include, but shall not be 
limited to: improving building shell insulation; air sealing; air duct sealing; improving air 

of 5 13 exchange and indoor air quality; upgrading windows, doors, and cladding systems; electric 
wiring and service upgrades; on site solar generation; electrical or thermal storage; electric peak 
load management equipment and software; and replacing fossil fuel appliances and equipment 
with electric or otherwise non-combusting appliances and equipment. A zero-carbon assessment 
shall include a safety evaluation including a combustion safety test of existing fossil fuel 
appliances, an instrumented test for ambient gas and particularly for gas leaks at the gas meter, 
and a test of existing carbon monoxide alarms. A customer whose building has undergone a zero-
carbon assessment shall be provided with a zero-carbon report that identifies for each measure 
that reduces emissions additional benefits including, but not limited to: (i) improvements in 
comfort, safety, and health, including indoor air quality; (ii) cost savings; and (iii) any other 
information the program administrators determine to be necessary to include. The zero-carbon 
report shall include at least one scenario incorporating a combination of efficiency measures, 
replacement of gas appliances with non-emitting appliances, on site solar energy and electrical 
storage which takes advantage of available promotional electric rates, income eligible electric 
rates and utility offerings for off peak and peak avoiding incentives to reduce projected client 
energy expenditures. The Massachusetts energy technology center shall develop the zero-carbon 
assessment and the zero-carbon report in consultation with the program administrators and the 
energy efficiency advisory council established pursuant to section 22 of this chapter. The 
commonwealth shall retain rights to the use of the zero-carbon assessment, the zero-carbon 
report, and any associated data and software for use by Mass Save or any successor organization. 
The zero-carbon assessment shall be the standard assessment service available to all customers 
receiving services provided pursuant to this section. 

of 5 35  SECTION 2. Section 21 of chapter 25 of the General Laws, as amended by chapter 179 
of the Acts of 2022, is hereby amended, in clause (xiv) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) by 
striking out “, delineated by utility and sector, including residential, residential low-income, 
commercial and industrial” and inserting in place thereof the following:- 
"; provided, that the data collected pursuant to subclauses (A), (B), and (C) shall be 
delineated by utility and sector, including residential, residential low-income, commercial and 
industrial, and zip code” 
SECTION 3. Said section 21 of said chapter 25, as amended by chapter 179 of the Acts 
of 2022, is hereby further amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:- 
"(h) The electric distribution companies, municipal aggregators with certified efficiency 
plans, and the natural gas distribution companies shall no later than March 31 of each year 
provide to the department the data that is collected pursuant to clause (xiv) of paragraph (2) of 
subsection 
(b) of this section during the previous calendar year. The department shall publish such 
data on the website of the energy efficiency advisory council no later than April 30 of each 
year." 
(i) The administrators of the programs established pursuant to section 19 of this chapter 
shall establish criteria to determine qualifications of contractors approved to install 
recommendations of the zero-carbon assessment authorized pursuant to subsection (h) of this 
section, including mitigation and remediation of barriers identified in such zero-carbon 
assessment. Such contractors approved to install such recommendations shall agree (i) to meet 
program and industry standards; (ii) to warrant their work for at least 12 months after completion 

of 5 57 of their work; (iii) to undergo quality assurance assessments of their work; and (iv) to require 
their employees and subcontractors to participate in periodic training programs and to adhere to 
program goals and standards as determined by such program administrators. In assembling lists 
of contractors approved to install recommendations of such zero-carbon assessments, such 
program administrators shall award preference to qualified businesses owned by women or by 
minorities …. [cite to statute defining those] and to qualified businesses located in or serving 
environmental justice communities [cite to statute defining those]. Such program administrators 
shall whenever feasible procure cost savings for customers through purchases in bulk of 
appliances and other equipment necessary for decarbonization of buildings. 
(j) Such program administrators shall develop (i) consulting programs to advise building 
owners undertaking projects to replace fossil fuel appliances and equipment with electric or 
otherwise non-combusting appliances and to upgrade and retrofit buildings as proposed in a zero 
carbon report; and (ii) training programs for participating staff, contractors, and volunteers that 
cover program procedures, costs and benefits of electrification of buildings, incentives available 
by electrification of buildings. 
(k) Such program administrators shall report annually no later than March 31 on results 
achieved by the programs established pursuant to this section to the governor and to the clerks of 
the house of representatives and the senate, who shall forward such reports to the president of the 
senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the chairs of the joint committee on 
telecommunications, utilities, and energy. 
(l) The department shall within 12 months of the effective date of this section promulgate 
such rules and regulations as are necessary to administer the requirements of this section. 

of 5 79  SECTION __. Section 1 shall take effect upon its passage and shall apply to energy 
efficiency plans beginning with the plan that covers the years 2025 to 2027.